Utah statutes.
26-19-13.7.   Recovery from recipient of incorrectly provided medical assistance.

The department may:

(1)  recover medical assistance incorrectly provided, whether due to administrative or factual error or fraud, from the recipient or his estate; and

(2)  pursuant to a judgment, impose a lien against real property of the recipient.



Enacted by Chapter 145, 1998 General Session

